Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB219.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the School-Based Youth Court Pilot Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Youth Court Program Account established under section 10(a)."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of 123456789101112131415161718 the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education.(3) The Pennsylvania State University.(4) The University of Pittsburgh.(5) Temple University.(6) Lincoln University.(7) Any other institution that is designated as "State-related" by the Commonwealth.(8) An accredited private or independent college or university."Local education agency." A school district, cyber charter school, charter school, area career and technical school or intermediate unit."Organizing entity." A local education agency or institution of higher education that is administering a school-based youth court."Program." The School-Based Youth Court Pilot Program established under section 4."Sanction." Discipline handed down by a youth court that a referred youth must perform to redress harm caused by the youth's conduct and assist the referred youth in acquiring insight into the consequences of the youth's behavior to make better decisions in the future. A sanction may include the following:(1) Cooperating with court-assigned mentors or tutors.(2) Mediated conversations between conflicting parties.(3) Goal-setting tasks tailored to respondent needs.(4) Customized dispositions.20250SB0219PN0168 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Mandatory performance of community service.(6) Participation on a youth court jury.(7) Attendance at education workshops.(8) Essay writing.(9) Letter of apology or oral apology.(10) Restitution and behavior modification classes.(11) Other tasks as outlined in a behavior contract."School." An elementary, middle or high school located in this Commonwealth."School-based youth court." A disciplinary court operated in a school that processes school disciplinary offenses."Trauma-informed approach." As defined in section 102 of the Public School Code of 1949."Youth." Any of the following:(1) An individual under 21 years of age at the time of the alleged offense for which the individual has been referred to a youth court.(2) An individual under 21 years of age enrolled in a school who has been referred to a school disciplinary proceeding for violating a school code of conduct or policy.Section 3. Resource center.The department shall establish an Education and Justice Resource Center to:(1) develop program guidelines and procedures under section 4(b);(2) identify and develop youth court training materials;(3) provide training and technical assistance for awardees of grants under section 6;(4) provide assistance to local education agencies seeking to start and operate youth courts;20250SB0219PN0168 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) oversee data collection from programs, including academic, socialization and civic engagement skill acquisition by youth court members;(6) engage with national and State youth court organizations;(7) support the growth and development of other restorative justice strategies in schools; and(8) ensure that all youth court members and trainers understand restorative principles and are trauma informed and that trauma training is completed before a formal hearing is held.Section 4. School-Based Youth Court Pilot Program.(a) Establishment.--The School-Based Youth Court Pilot Program is established within the department to support the development of youth courts in schools as a trauma-informed approach to alternative disciplinary disposition and effective system of restorative justice for student misconduct. The program shall operate for three full school years, beginning with the first school year that begins at least six months after the effective date of this subsection.(b) Guidelines and procedures.--No later than six months after the effective date of this subsection, the department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency, shall establish guidelines and procedures for the program, which shall include the following:(1) Procedures for referring school-based summary and misdemeanor cases to youth courts, which shall include procedures to prevent fingerprinting, photographing and the occurrence of any other indicators of an arrest for any youth referred to a youth court.20250SB0219PN0168 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Guidelines for youth court operations.(3) Procedures for data collection and reporting.(4) Other necessary program requirements as determined by the department in consultation with the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.(c) Use of money.--Money in the account shall be used to award grants under section 6 and administer this act.Section 5. Youth court.(a) Court membership.--A youth court shall consist of a judge and a peer tribunal or peer jury as follows:(1) Only a youth eligible under this act to be referred to a youth court for an alleged violation of State law, municipal ordinance or school code of conduct or policy may serve as a judge or on a peer tribunal or peer jury.(2) A youth court that used a judge who is older than 21 years of age prior to the effective date of this subsection may continue to use a judge who is older than 21 years of age.(b) Training.--Youth who operate a youth court shall be trained by lawyers, teachers, counselors, mediation experts, trained students of institutions of higher education and others as approved by the organizing entity.(c) Procedures.--A youth court's operational procedures must be adopted from other Pennsylvania youth courts, the National Association of Youth Courts or as created by the students who operate the youth court. All operating procedures must be approved by the organizing entity.(d) Sanctions.--A sanction must be restorative in nature and the types of sanctions shall be adopted by each youth court after approval by the organizing entity.20250SB0219PN0168 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Code of conduct.--A youth court shall establish a code of conduct, which shall include operational bylaws for governance and a procedural manual describing the court's operations.(f) Type of youth court.--The youth court may operate as an after-school program or be integrated within existing school curriculum.Section 6. Grants.(a) Awards.--The Secretary of Education shall award up to six grants each fiscal year to help schools develop youth courts in accordance with this act.(b) Grant amount.--The amount of a grant may not exceed $250,000.(c) Procedure.--The department shall develop a procedure for awarding grants under the program. The procedure shall include a rubric to prioritize grant awards, which shall include and prioritize the following:(1) School districts with a local capacity per weighted student under section 2502.53 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, below the Statewide median.(2) Rates of student disciplinary actions, including suspensions and expulsions.(3) Proposed projects that include partnerships with external partners, including institutions of higher education, nonprofit partners, law offices or external evaluators.Section 7. Application.(a) Development.--The department shall develop an application by which a local education agency may apply for a 20250SB0219PN0168 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grant under this act. The application shall include the following:(1) Narrative description of the proposed pilot project.(2) Narrative description of demonstrated need.(3) Relevant disciplinary data from prior school years, as determined necessary by the department, including the number of referrals of students to law enforcement.(4) The organizing entities and project partners, including external partners such as institutions of higher education, nonprofit partners, law offices or external evaluators.(5) Projected program outcomes.(b) Submission of applications.--An application under subsection (a) must be submitted by a local education agency or an institution of higher education. A local education agency may apply on behalf of itself or on behalf of one or more local education agencies. An institution of higher education may apply on behalf of itself or on behalf of one or more local education agencies.Section 8. Reports by grantee.An organizing entity that receives an award under this act shall submit to the department, in a format determined by the department, an annual report at the end of each grant period with an evaluation report of program outcomes. The report shall include the following:(1) Number of suspension-eligible cases avoided through referrals to youth courts.(2) Number of total cases referred to youth courts.(3) Number of police referrals deferred to youth courts.(4) Number of individual students referred to youth 20250SB0219PN0168 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 courts.(5) List of the nature of cases referred to youth courts.(6) Number of students receiving youth court training.(7) Any other outcomes determined by the department.Section 9. Reports by department.The department shall prepare an annual report on the outcomes and progress of the program and the Education and Justice Resource Center's work. The report shall be published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall be submitted to the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The Office of Safe Schools Advocate of the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.(6) District attorneys and courts of common pleas of a county in which an organizing entity has received a grant under this act.Section 10. Youth Court Program Account.(a) Establishment.--The Youth Court Program Account is established as an account in the General Fund. Money in the account shall not lapse.(b) Appropriation.--All money deposited into the account under subsection (c) and the interest the money accrues is 20250SB0219PN0168 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to implement this act.(c) Transfer from General Fund.--The sum of $9,500,000 shall be transferred from the General Fund to the account for the purpose of awarding grants to develop youth courts in accordance with this act and administering this act.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0219PN0168 - 9 - 123456789